Hawaii, session 2025, SB495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii relies on the importation of approximately one hundred million pounds of meat annually to meet the nutritional and protein needs of the State.  The legislature recognizes that there are high costs associated with transporting imported meat and agricultural products and immense logistical challenges associated with delivering high quality and nutritious protein sources to the State.  The State's dependence on imported meat not only decreases its ability to be self-sufficient, but also makes it vulnerable to fluctuations in global supply chain issues, including disruptions from natural disasters, economic shifts in domestic markets, and policies that impact global trade partnerships. The legislature further finds that the practice of shock aging is an innovative meat processing technique that reduces processing times while minimizing microbial contamination and improving tenderness, palatability, texture, aroma, and flavor.  The legislature further recognizes that adopting shock aging technology could strengthen the local agricultural economy, reduce reliance on imports, and open new avenues for high-value meat exports.  With appropriate investments in infrastructure and training, the State could become a leader in premium meat production, benefiting the local community and broader markets. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to support shock aging processes in the State. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the agribusiness development corporation to develop, construct, and support facilities that can accommodate shock aging processes for meat products. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the Hawaii agricultural development revolving fund established pursuant to section 163D-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the Hawaii agricultural development revolving fund the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for programmatic funding relating to facilities using shock aging processes for meat products. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. The agribusiness development corporation may contract with slaughterhouses currently operating in the State, or planning for future operation in the State, for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________